Maryland, session 2026, SB0033.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – Property
12–108.
(p) (1) (i) In this subsection the following words have the meanings
indicated.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0033*

SENATE BILL 33
(ii) “Business entity” means a limited liability company, corporation,
limited partnership, [or] statutory trust, OR COMMON LAW TRUST.
(iii) “Owner” means a member, stockholder, limited partner, or
beneficial owner of a business entity OR OTHER PERSON, AS DEFINED IN § 12–101 OF
THE CORPORATIONS AND ASSOCIATIONS ARTICLE.
(iv) “Ownership interest” means a membership interest, stock,
limited partnership interest, or beneficial interest.
(2) An instrument of writing is not subject to recordation tax if the
instrument of writing is:
(i) a transfer of title to real property between a parent business
entity and its wholly owned subsidiary business entity or between 2 or more subsidiary
business entities wholly owned by the same parent business entity, if the parent business
entity is an original owner of the subsidiary business entity, or became an owner through
gift or bequest from an original owner of the subsidiary business entity, for:
1. no consideration;
2. nominal consideration; or
3. consideration that comprises only the issuance,
cancellation, or surrender of the ownership interests of a subsidiary business entity;
(ii) an instrument of writing made pursuant to the reorganization of
a business entity as described in § 368(a) of the Internal Revenue Code; or
(iii) a transfer of title to real property from a subsidiary business
entity to its parent business entity for no consideration, nominal consideration or
consideration that comprises only the issuance, cancellation, or surrender of a subsidiary’s
ownership interest, where the parent business entity:
1. previously owned the real property;
2. currently owns the ownership interest of the subsidiary
and has owned that ownership interest for a period greater than 18 months; or
3. acquires the ownership interest of a subsidiary business
entity which has been in existence and has owned the real property for a period of 2 years.
13–207.
(a) An instrument of writing is not subject to transfer tax to the same extent that
it is not subject to recordation tax under:

SENATE BILL 33 3
(9) § 12–108(p) of this article (Transfer of property between related
business entities);
13–405.
(c) A corporate, limited liability company, [or] partnership, OR OTHER transfer
as described in § 12–108(p), (q), (v), (w), (y), and (bb) of this article is not subject to the
county transfer tax.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026, and shall be applicable to instruments of writing recorded on or after July 1, 2026.